Hawaii, session 2025, HB80.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The purpose of this Act is to effectuate the title of this Act. SECTION 2.  The Hawaii Revised Statutes is amended to conform to the purpose of this Act. SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________